Utah statutes.
41-1a-1001.   Definitions.
As used in Sections 41-1a-1001 through 41-1a-1008:
(1)  "Certified vehicle inspector" means a person employed by the Motor
Vehicle Enforcement Division as qualified through experience, training, or
both to identify and analyze damage to vehicles with either unibody or
conventional frames.
(2)  "Major component part" means:
(a)  the front body component of a motor vehicle consisting of the structure
forward of the firewall;
(b)  the passenger body component of a motor vehicle including the firewall,
roof, and extending to and including the rear-most seating;
(c)  the rear body component of a motor vehicle consisting of the main cross
member directly behind the rear-most seating excluding any auxiliary seating
and structural body assembly rear of the cross members; and
(d)  the frame of a motor vehicle consisting of the structural member that
supports the auto body.
(3) (a)  "Major damage" means damage to a major component part of the motor
vehicle requiring 10 or more hours to repair or replace, as determined by a
collision estimating guide recognized by the Motor Vehicle Enforcement
Division.
(b)  For purposes of Subsection (a) repair or replacement hours do not include
time spent on cosmetic repairs.
(4)  "Owner" means the person who has the legal right to possession of the
vehicle.
(5) (a)  "Salvage certificate" means a certificate of ownership issued for a
salvage vehicle before a new certificate of title is issued for the vehicle.
(b)  A salvage certificate is not valid for registration purposes.
(6)  "Salvage vehicle" means any vehicle:
(a)  damaged by collision, flood, or other occurrence to the extent that the
cost of repairing the vehicle for safe operation exceeds its fair market
value; or
(b)  that has been declared a salvage vehicle by an insurer or other state or
jurisdiction, but is not precluded from further registration and titling.
(7)  "Unbranded title" means a certificate of title for a previously damaged
motor vehicle without any designation that the motor vehicle has been damaged.
(8)  "Vehicle damage disclosure statement" means the form designed and
furnished by the Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division for a damaged motor
vehicle inspection under Section 41-1a-1002.
